Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB664.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 1, 1945 (P.L.1242, No.428), known as the State Highway Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 912. Road Salt Management Best Practices Guide.--(a) Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, the department, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, shall develop the Road Salt Management Best Practices Guide for use by local jurisdictions and the Commonwealth to minimize the adverse environmental impacts of road salt runoff.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The department shall annually update the guide required under subsection (a) and shall make the guide available to the public on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) In the guide, the department may:(1) Establish RECOMMEND best management practices that protect the environment from the negative impacts of road salt.(2) Identify all activities that may result in the release of road salt into the environment, including road salt storage, the application of road salt on highways and the disposal of snow that contains road salt.(3) Take into consideration highway safety to the greatest extent possible.(4) Establish RECOMMEND standards and procedures for identifying:(i) areas that are particularly vulnerable to road salt runoff; and(ii) additional road salt management practices that need to be implemented in those areas.(5) Establish RECOMMEND goals for achieving a reduction of the environmental impact of road salt released into the environment.(6) Include recommendations for a model training program for all State, local and contract personnel who perform winter maintenance activities involving the use of road salt.(7) Establish RECOMMEND response procedures to address uncontrolled releases of road salt that may adversely impact the environment.(8) Establish recordkeeping and annual reporting procedures for the quantity of road salt used, the locations where the road salt is used and any training conducted. FOR COMMONWEALTH 20250HB0664PN2417 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AGENCIES RELATED TO ROAD SALT USAGE, TRAINING PROGRAMS, APPLICATION METHODS AND OTHER RELEVANT CONSIDERATIONS AS MAY BE DEEMED APPROPRIATE BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ORDER TO PROVIDE RELEVANT GUIDANCE ON ACCEPTABLE THRESHOLDS OF ROAD SALT USAGE, PROMOTE SAFE ROAD TRAVEL AND PREVENT THE OVERUSE OF ROAD SALT. THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR A MUNICIPALITY OR OTHER LOCAL GOVERNMENT ENTITY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Guide." The Road Salt Management Best Practices Guide required under this section."ROAD SALT." SOLID CHEMICAL PRODUCTS STORED AND UTILIZED FOR THE PRINCIPAL PURPOSE OF DE-ICING ROADWAYS FOR PUBLIC SAFETY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, SODIUM CHLORIDE, MAGNESIUM CHLORIDE, CALCIUM CHLORIDE, CALCIUM MAGNESIUM ACETATE, POTASSIUM ACETATE AND MIXTURES THEREOF. THE TERM SHALL NOT INCLUDE OIL-RELATED AND GAS-RELATED WASTEWATER, TOPHOLE WATER, PRODUCTION WATER OF ANY TYPE, BRINE OR WASTEWATER SLUDGE FROM CONVENTIONAL OR UNCONVENTIONAL OIL AND GAS WELLS.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0664PN2417 - 3 - <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223